Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5508
Board, defined.

Board means the Invest Nebraska Board, which shall consist of the Governor, the State Treasurer, and the chairperson of the Nebraska Investment Council.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 8.